Washington statutes.
RCW 36.94.230

Local improvement districts and utility local improvement districts—Initiation of district by resolution or petition—Publication—Notice to property owners—Contents.

Utility local improvement districts and local improvement districts to carry out all or any portion of the general plan, or additions and betterments thereof, may be initiated either by resolution of the county legislative authority or by petition signed by the owners according to the records of the office of the county assessor of at least fifty-one percent of the area of land within the limits of the local district to be created.

In case the county legislative authority desires to initiate the formation of a local district by resolution, it shall first pass a resolution declaring its intention to order such improvement, setting forth the nature and territorial extent of such proposed improvement, designating the number of the proposed local district, describing the boundaries thereof, stating the estimated cost and expense of the improvement and the proportionate amount thereof which will be borne by the property within the proposed district, and fixing a date, time, and place for a public hearing on the formation of the proposed local district.

In case any such local district is initiated by petition, such petition shall set forth the nature and territorial extent of such proposed improvement and the fact that the signers thereof are the owners according to the records of the county assessor of at least fifty-one percent of the area of land within the limits of the local district to be created. Upon the filing of such petition with the clerk of the county legislative authority, the authority shall determine whether the same is sufficient, and the authority's determination thereof shall be conclusive upon all persons. No person may withdraw his or her name from said petition after the filing thereof with the clerk of the county legislative authority. If the county legislative authority finds the petition to be sufficient, it shall proceed to adopt a resolution declaring its intention to order the improvement petitioned for, setting forth the nature and territorial extent of said improvement, designating the number of the proposed local district, describing the boundaries thereof, stating the estimated cost and expense of the improvement and the proportionate amount thereof which will be borne by the property within the proposed local district, and fixing a date, time, and place for a public hearing on the formation of the proposed local district.

Notice of the adoption of the resolution of intention, whether adopted on the initiative of the board or pursuant to a petition of the property owners, shall be published in at least two consecutive issues of a newspaper of general circulation in the proposed local district, the date of the first publication to be at least fifteen days prior to the date fixed by such resolution for hearing before the county legislative authority. Notice of the adoption of the resolution of intention shall also be given each owner or reputed owner of any lot, tract, parcel of land, or other property within the proposed local district by mailing said notice at least fifteen days before the date fixed for the public hearing to the owner or reputed owner of the property as shown on the tax rolls of the county treasurer at the address shown thereon. The notice shall refer to the resolution of intention and designate the proposed local district by number. Said notice shall also set forth the nature of the proposed improvement, the total estimated cost, the proportion of total cost to be borne by assessments, the estimated amount of the cost and expense of such improvement to be borne by the particular lot, tract, or parcel, the date, time, and place of the hearing before the county legislative authority; and in the case of improvements initiated by resolution, said notice shall also state that all persons desiring to object to the formation of the proposed district must file their written protests with the clerk of the county legislative authority before the time fixed for said public hearing.

[ 2002 c 168 s 2; 1981 c 313 s 4; 1971 ex.s. c 96 s 10; 1967 c 72 s 23.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 313: See note following RCW 36.94.020.

Construction—Severability—1971 ex.s. c 96: See notes following RCW 36.94.010.